tests/syntax/noops.sbl
// Test no-op commands which should get canonicalised.
externals (stem)
integers (x y)
booleans (b)
strings (s)
define stem as (
  $x = 0
  [substring] among ( // All actions equivalent to `true`.
    '0' ()
    'a' (())
    'b' (true)
    'c' ('')
    'd' (loop 0 next)
    'e' (loop -1 next)
    'f' (hop 0)
    'g' ($x += 0)
    'h' ($x -= 0)
    'i' ($x *= 1)
    'j' ($x /= 1)
    'k' ($x = x)
    'l' (atmark cursor)
    'm' (tomark cursor)
    'n' (among (''))
    'o' (substring among (''))
    'p' (among ('' (atmark cursor)))
    'q' (substring atmark cursor among (''))
    'r' (substring atmark cursor among ('' (atmark cursor)))
    's' (insert '')
    't' (attach '')

    // Values set are unused.
    'aa' ($y = 1)
    'ab' ($y += 1)
    'ac' ($y -= 1)
    'ad' ($y *= 2)
    'ae' ($y /= 2)
    'af' (setmark y)
    'ag' (set b)
    'ah' (unset b)
    'ai' (-> s)

    // Integer tests.
    'A' ($(1 == 1))
    'B' ($(2 > 1))
    'C' ($(-1 < 0))
    'D' ($(-1 <= -1))
    'E' ($(0 >= 0))
    'F' ($(1 != 0))
  )

  // `setlimit tomark limit for X` is equivalent to just `X`.
  setlimit tomark limit for 'X'

  [substring] among ( // All actions equivalent to `false`.
    '0' (false)
    'a' (fail ())
    'b' (fail true)
    'c' (fail '')
    'd' (fail loop 0 next)
    'e' (fail loop -1 next)
    'f' (fail hop 0)
    'g' (fail $x += 0)
    'h' (fail $x -= 0)
    'i' (fail $x *= 1)
    'j' (fail $x /= 1)

    // Integer tests which are always false.
    'A' ($(1 != 1))
    'B' ($(1 > 2))
    'C' ($(-1 > 0))
    'D' ($(0 <= -1))
    'E' ($(0 >= 1))
    'F' ($(1 == 0))
  )
)
